test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - кал: # Ordinary nouns 'woman' - full paradigm including MWN
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: кал
     кал+N+SP+Gen+Indef: калонь
     кал+N+SP+Abl+Indef: калда
     кал+N+SP+Dat+Indef: калонди
     кал+N+SP+Abe+Indef: калфтома
     кал+N+SP+Comp+Indef: калшка
     кал+N+SP+Ine+Indef: калса
     кал+N+SP+Ela+Indef: калста
     кал+N+SP+Ill+Indef: калс
     кал+N+SP+Prl+Indef: калга
     кал+N+SP+Tra+Indef: калкс
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: калозе
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: калоне
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: калозень
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: калнень
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [калозти, калозенди]
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: калненди
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: калдон
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: калфтомон
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: калшкан
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: калсон
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: калстон
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: калозон
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: калган
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: калце
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: калхне
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: калцень
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: калхнень
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: калдот
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: калфтомот
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: калшкат
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: калсот
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: калстот
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: калозот
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: калгат
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: калц
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: калонза
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: калонц
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: калонзон
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: калонцты
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: калонзонды
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: калдонза
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: калфтомонза
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: калшканза
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: калсонза
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: калстонза
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: калзонза
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: калганза
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: калоньке
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: калоньконь
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: калоньконди
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: калдонк
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: калфтомонк
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: калшканк
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: калсонк
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: калстонк
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: калзонк
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: калганк
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: калонте
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: калонтень
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: калонтенди
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: калдонт
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: калфтомонт
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: калшкант
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: калсонт
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: калстонт
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: калозонт
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: калгант
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: калсна
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: калснон
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: калснонды
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: калдост
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: калфтомост
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: калшкаст
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: калсост
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: калстост
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: калозост
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: калгаст
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: калхт
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+Def: калсь
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+Def: калть
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [калти, калонди]
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+Def: калхне
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+Def: калхнень
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+Def: калхненди
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: каловок
     кал+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: калоньвок
     #кал+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/гЕ: калоньге 
     #сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: сонга 
     кал+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: калдовок
     кал+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: калоньдивок
     кал+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: калфтомовок
     кал+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: калшкавок
     кал+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: калсовок
     кал+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: калстовок
     кал+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: калска
     кал+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: калгавок
     кал+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: калкска
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калозевок
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калоневок
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калозеньге
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калоненьге
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [калозтивок, калозендивок]
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калонендивок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калдонга
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калфтомонга
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калшканка
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калсонга
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калстонга
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калозонга
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: калганга
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калцевок
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калхневок
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калценьге
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калхненьге
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калдотка
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калфтомотка
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калшкатка
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калсотка
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калстотка
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калозотка
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: калгатка
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калцевок
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калонзовок
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калонцка
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калонзонга
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калонцтывок
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калонзондывок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калдонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калфтомонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калшканзовок
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калсонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калстонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калзонзовок
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: калганзовок
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калонькевок
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калоньконьге
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калонькондивок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калдонковок
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калфтомонковок
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калшканковок
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калсонковок
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калстонковок
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калзонковок
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: калганковок
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калонтевок
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калонтеньге
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калонтендивок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калдонтка
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калфтомонтовок
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калшкантовок
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калсонтка
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калстонтка
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калозонтка
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: калгантка
     кал+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калсновок
     кал+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калснонга
     кал+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калснондывок
     кал+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калдостка
     кал+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калфтомостка
     кал+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калшкастка
     кал+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калсостка
     кал+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калстостка
     кал+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калозостка
     кал+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: калгастка
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: калхтка
     кал+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: калське
     кал+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: калтьке
     кал+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: [калтивок, калоньдивок]
     кал+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: калхневок
     кал+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: калхненьге
     кал+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: калхнендивок
